Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-1471.01
Writing or written, defined.

Writing or written, when used in reference to a notice or document to be provided by or to a landlord or tenant, includes a notice or document provided by electronic means in accordance with section 76-1474.

Laws 2025, LB185, § 5.